Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.010

Words defined.

Words used in the singular in this chapter may also be applied to the plural of the persons and things; words importing the plural may be applied to the singular; words importing the masculine gender may be extended to females also; the term "commission" used in this chapter shall mean the Washington state dental quality assurance commission; and the term "secretary" shall mean the secretary of health of the state of Washington.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 202; 1991 c 3 s 58; 1935 c 112 s 1; RRS s 10031-1.]

NOTES:

Number and gender: RCW 1.12.050.